Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB1185.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1135. (1) Upon enrollment of a student for the first time in a local school district, public school academy, or intermediate school district, the local school district, public school academy, or intermediate school district shall notify in writing the person individual enrolling the student that within 30 days he or she the individual shall provide to the local school district, public school academy, or intermediate school district either of the following: (a) A copy of the student's birth certificate. (b) Other reliable proof, as determined by the local school district, public school academy, or intermediate school district, of the student's identity and age, and an affidavit explaining the inability to produce a copy of the birth certificate. (2) If a person an individual enrolling a student fails to comply with subsection (1), the local school district, public school academy, or intermediate school district shall notify the person individual enrolling the student in writing that, unless he or she the individual complies within 30 days after the notification, the case must be referred to the local law enforcement agency for investigation. If the person individual enrolling the student fails to comply within that 30-day period, the local school district, public school academy, or intermediate school district shall notify the local law enforcement agency. (3) The local school district, public school academy, or intermediate school district shall immediately report to the local law enforcement agency any affidavit received under this section that appears inaccurate or suspicious in form or content. (4) Within By not later than 14 days after enrolling a transfer student, the school shall request in writing directly from the student's previous school a copy of his or her the student's school record. Any school that compiles records for each student in the school and that is requested to forward a copy of a transferring student's record to the new school shall comply within 30 days after receipt of the request unless the record has been tagged under section 1134. If a student record has been tagged under section 1134, a copy of the student record must not be forwarded, and the requested school shall notify the law enforcement agency that notified the school district of the missing student under section 8 of 1968 PA 319, MCL 28.258, of the request. (5) A local school district, public school academy, or intermediate school district shall not disclose any personally identifiable information contained in a student record to a law enforcement agency, except in compliance with 20 USC 1232g, commonly referred to as the family educational rights and privacy act. Sec. 1321. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a board of a school district provides transportation for its resident pupils, other than students with a disability transported under article 3 or other pupils who cannot safely walk to school, the school board shall provide transportation to and from school for each resident public school or nonpublic school pupil if both of the following requirements are met: (a) The school district provides transportation for the elementary school level, middle or junior high school level, or high school level, as defined by the local school board, in which the pupil is enrolled. (b) The pupil attends either the public or the nearest state approved nonpublic school in the school district to which the pupil is eligible to be admitted. (2) Transportation provided under subsection (1) shall must be without charge to the resident pupil, the parent, guardian, or person standing in loco parentis to the pupil. (3) A Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), a school district is not required to transport or pay for transportation of a resident pupil living within 1-1/2 miles, by the nearest traveled route, to the public or state approved nonpublic school in which the pupil is enrolled. A school district is not required to transport or pay for the transportation of a resident pupil attending a nonpublic school who lives in an area less than 1-1/2 miles from a public school in which public school pupils are not transported, except that the school district shall transport or pay for the transportation of the resident pupil from the public school within the area to the nonpublic school the pupil attends. (4) A Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5), a school district is not required to transport or pay for the transportation of resident pupils to state approved nonpublic schools located outside the district unless the school district transports some of its the school district's resident pupils, other than students with a disability under article 3, to public schools located outside the district, in which case the school district shall transport or pay for the transportation of resident pupils attending a state approved nonpublic school at least to the distance of the public schools located outside the district to which the district transports resident pupils and in the same general direction. (5) The board of a school district shall provide or arrange transportation to a student experiencing homelessness, including an unaccompanied homeless youth, as required under section 1562. Sec. 1562. (1) A local educational agency in this state shall do all of the following: (a) Develop, review, and revise policies that may act as barriers to the identification, enrollment, retention, and success in school of students experiencing homelessness, including barriers related to the following: (i) Transportation. (ii) Lack of available records normally required for enrollment, such as birth certificates, previous school records, immunization records, medical records, proof of residency, or other documentation. (iii) Guardianship issues. (iv) Transfer of credits and partial credits. (v) Local graduation requirements that exceed the curriculum requirements described in sections 1278a and 1278b. (vi) Truancy. (vii) Discipline. (viii) Uniform or dress code requirements. (ix) Outstanding fees or fines. (x) Issues related to absences. (b) Submit data for students experiencing homelessness to CEPI regarding all of the following: (i) The number of students identified as experiencing homelessness using data elements designated by the department and CEPI (ii) Enrollment and transfer. (iii) Attendance. (iv) Credit accrual. (v) Graduation status. (vi) Discipline, including suspensions and expulsions. (c) Coordinate with public and private agencies or programs to provide services to students experiencing homelessness and their families. (d) Coordinate with other local educational agencies on issues such as transportation and transfer of school records. (e) Ensure that students experiencing homelessness are not denied access to services available to other students because of homelessness, lack of records, lack of proof of residency, guardianship issues, transportation barriers, outstanding fees or fines, absences, or other barriers related to the student's housing situation. (f) Designate a homeless education liaison responsible for the following: (i) Ensuring that students experiencing homelessness are enrolled in and have a full and equal opportunity to succeed in schools of the local educational agency. (ii) Coordinating referrals for students experiencing homelessness and their families to housing, health care, dental care, mental health services, and other appropriate services. (iii) Ensuring that students experiencing homelessness are identified by school personnel, public social service agencies, and community agencies through outreach, professional development, and coordination activities. (iv) Informing parents and legal guardians of students experiencing homelessness of educational and other related opportunities available to their children, and ensuring that parents and legal guardians are provided with meaningful opportunities to participate in the education of their children. (v) Disseminating public notice of the educational rights of students experiencing homelessness in the schools, community agencies, motels, shelters, and organizations where students experiencing homelessness and their families receive services, in a form and manner understandable to parents and legal guardians of students experiencing homelessness and unaccompanied homeless youth. (vi) Ensuring that parents and legal guardians of students experiencing homelessness, and unaccompanied homeless youth, are fully informed of all transportation services, including transportation to school, and are assisted in accessing the transportation services described in this subparagraph. (vii) Collaborating with the local educational agency personnel responsible for administering programs under title I, part A of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, 20 USC 6311 to 6339, regarding the reservation of funds under section 6313(c)(3)(A) of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, 20 USC 6313(c)(3)(A), and the provision of educationally related support services to students experiencing homelessness. (viii) Reserving funds as necessary under section 6313(c)(3)(A) of the elementary and secondary education act of 1965, 20 USC 6313(c)(3)(A), to provide services to students experiencing homelessness, including educationally related support services. In determining the amount reserved, the local educational agency shall annually assess the needs of students experiencing homelessness in consultation with the homeless education liaison designated under this section. (ix) Developing and implementing a program to train school personnel on at least an annual basis regarding the educational rights of students experiencing homelessness, policies and procedures to identify and serve students experiencing homelessness, and the special needs of students experiencing homelessness, including students experiencing homelessness who are under 6 years of age and unaccompanied homeless youth. (x) Assisting unaccompanied homeless youth in the school selection and enrollment process. (xi) Ensuring that enrollment disputes are mediated according to the department's appeal process consistent with subsection (9). (xii) Ensuring that students experiencing homelessness and their families receive all available educational services, including services through Head Start programs, including Early Head Start programs, under the head start act, Public Law 110-134, early intervention services under subchapter III of the individuals with disabilities education act, 20 USC 1431 to 1444, and any other preschool and early childhood programs administered by the local educational agency. (2) The department shall do all of the following: (a) Respond to inquiries from parents and legal guardians of students experiencing homelessness, and from unaccompanied homeless youth, to ensure that each student who is the subject of such an inquiry receives the full protections and services provided by state and federal law. (b) Collect data from local educational agencies in the following areas: (i) Identification of homeless eligibility. (ii) Enrollment and transfer. (iii) Attendance. (iv) Credit accrual. (v) Graduation status. (vi) Discipline, including suspensions and expulsions. (c) Coordinate and collaborate with educators and other personnel to improve identification, enrollment, school stability, transportation coordination, access to services, and dispute resolution for students experiencing homelessness. To fulfill the requirements of this subdivision, the department shall collaborate with at least the following groups and individuals: (i) Child development and preschool program personnel. (ii) Providers of services to students experiencing homelessness, runaway students, and homeless families. (iii) Local educational agency homeless education liaisons. (iv) Community organizations and groups representing students experiencing homelessness and their families. (d) Facilitate systems for coordination of services to students experiencing homelessness with other state agencies. (e) Provide technical assistance to, and conduct monitoring of, local educational agencies to ensure local educational agency compliance. (f) Provide professional development opportunities for local educational agency personnel to assist in identifying and meeting the needs of students experiencing homelessness, including students experiencing homelessness who are under 6 years of age and unaccompanied homeless youth. (3) A local educational agency serving a student experiencing homelessness shall do 1 of the following, according to the student's best interest: (a) Continue the student's education in the student's school of origin for the duration of homelessness in any case in which a student becomes homeless between academic years or during an academic year, and for the remainder of the academic year in which the student becomes permanently housed. (b) Enroll the student in any public school that nonhomeless students living in the attendance area in which the student is living are eligible to attend. (4) In determining the best interest of the student under subsection (3), the local educational agency shall do all of the following: (a) Presume that keeping the student in the school of origin is in the student's best interest, except when doing so is contrary to the request of the student's parent or legal guardian, or the request of an unaccompanied homeless youth. (b) Give priority to the request of the student's parent or legal guardian, or the request of an unaccompanied homeless youth. (c) Consider the following student-centered factors: (i) The student's age. (ii) The school that the student's siblings attend. (iii) The student's experiences at the school of origin. (iv) The student's academic needs. (v) The student's emotional needs. (vi) Any other special needs of the student or family. (vii) Continuity of instruction. (viii) The anticipated length of stay in the temporary housing, if known. (ix) The time remaining in the school year. (x) The distance of the student's commute and the impact it may have on the student's education. (xi) The safety of the student. (d) Provide a written explanation to the parent, legal guardian, or unaccompanied homeless youth, in a manner and form understandable to the parent, legal guardian, or unaccompanied homeless youth, including a statement regarding the right to appeal under subsection (9), if the local educational agency determines that a school other than the school of origin or a school requested by the parent, legal guardian, or unaccompanied homeless youth is in the student's best interest. (e) In the case of an unaccompanied homeless youth, ensure that the local educational agency homeless education liaison does both of the following: (i) Assists with placement and enrollment. (ii) Gives priority to the views of the unaccompanied homeless youth. (5) A school selected under subsection (3) shall immediately enroll a student experiencing homelessness even if the student is unable to produce records normally required for enrollment, such as previous academic records, medical records, proof of residency, proof of guardianship, or other documentation. A homeless education liaison shall assist in acquiring these documents after immediately enrolling the student. (6) When the governing body of a public school becomes aware that a student seeking to enroll is a student experiencing homelessness, and the student does not have appropriate transfer, medical, or other documentation, the governing body shall do all of the following: (a) Immediately enroll the student. (b) Immediately contact the former school for transfer information and relevant academic and other records. (c) If the student needs to obtain immunizations, or immunization or medical records, immediately refer the parent or guardian of the student to a homeless education liaison, who shall assist in obtaining necessary immunizations or medical records. (7) A local educational agency shall do all of the following: (a) Provide transportation to and from the school of origin at the request of the parent, legal guardian, or unaccompanied homeless youth for as long as the student attends the school of origin and remains homeless, or until the end of the current school year in which the student becomes permanently housed. (b) Assist students experiencing homelessness with transportation to extracurricular, preschool, and public early childhood programs if the lack of transportation prevents the student from participating. (c) Provide students experiencing homelessness with transportation services comparable to the transportation services provided to nonhomeless students attending the same school. (d) Notify the student and parent or guardian of the availability of transportation services. (8) If a student experiencing homelessness no longer resides in the area served by the local educational agency of origin but attends the school of origin, the local educational agency of origin and the local educational agency in which the student experiencing homelessness is living shall agree upon a method to apportion the responsibility and costs for providing the student with transportation to and from the school of origin. If the local educational agencies are unable to agree on a method of transportation, the responsibility and actual costs for transportation must be shared equally. (9) Each local educational agency shall implement the dispute resolution process established or designated by the department to address disputes arising regarding eligibility, school selection, and enrollment of students experiencing homelessness under this section. During the dispute resolution process, including any appeals, the student must be immediately enrolled in an eligible school in which enrollment is sought and provided transportation as described in subsection (7) pending resolution of the dispute. In the case of an unaccompanied homeless youth, the homeless education liaison shall ensure that the youth is immediately enrolled in an eligible school in which the youth is seeking enrollment pending resolution of the dispute. For the purposes of this subsection, an eligible school is any public school that nonhomeless students living in the attendance area are eligible to attend. (10) As used in this section: (a) "CEPI" means the center for educational performance and information created under section 94a of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1694a. (b) "Enroll" and "enrollment" mean attending classes and participating fully in school activities. (c) "Living" refers to the location of the child's or youth's primary nighttime residence. (d) "Local educational agency" means a school district, intermediate school district, or public school academy. (e) "School of origin" means the public school, preschool, or other public early childhood or educational program the student attended when permanently housed or the school in which the child or youth was last enrolled, including the designated receiving school at the next grade level for all feeder schools when the child or youth completes the final grade level served by the school of origin. (f) "Student experiencing homelessness" means a child or youth who lacks a fixed, regular, and adequate nighttime place of residence, including the following: (i) Children and youth who are sharing the housing of other persons due to loss of housing, economic hardship, or a similar reason, are living in motels, hotels, trailer parks, or camping grounds due to lack of alternative adequate accommodations, are living in emergency or transitional shelters, also referred to as transitional housing, or are abandoned in hospitals. (ii) Children and youth who have a primary nighttime residence that is a public or private place not designed for or ordinarily used as a regular sleeping accommodation for individuals. (iii) Children and youth who are living in cars, parks, public spaces, abandoned buildings, substandard housing, bus or train stations, or similar settings. (g) "Unaccompanied homeless youth" means a student experiencing homelessness not in the physical custody of a parent or guardian.